Florida, session 2026, HB355.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb355 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 355 2026 Legislature
Section 1. Subsections (6) and (7) are added to section
395.1012, Florida Statutes, to read:
395.1012 Patient safety.—
(6)(a) Each hospital with an emergency department must:
1. Develop and implement policies and procedures for
pediatric patient care in the emergency department which reflect
evidence-based best practices relating to, at a minimum:
a. Triage.
b. Measuring and recording vital signs.
c. Weighing and recording weights in kilograms.
d. Calculating medication dosages.
e. Use of pediatric instruments.
2. Conduct training at least annually on the policies and
procedures developed under this subsection. The training must
include, at a minimum:
a. The use of pediatric instruments, as applicable to each
licensure type, using clinical simulation as defined in s.
464.003.
b. Drills that simulate emergency situations. Each
emergency department must conduct drills at least annually.
(b) Each hospital emergency department must:
1. Designate a pediatric emergency care coordinator. The
pediatric emergency care coordinator must be a physician or a
physician assistant licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, a
nurse licensed under chapter 464, or a paramedic licensed under
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb355 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 355 2026 Legislature
chapter 401. The pediatric emergency care coordinator is
responsible for implementation of and ensuring fidelity to the
policies and procedures adopted under this subsection.
2. Conduct the National Pediatric Readiness Assessment
developed by the National Pediatric Readiness Project, in
accordance with timelines established by the National Pediatric
Readiness Project.
(7) Each hospital with an emergency department may conduct
the National Pediatric Readiness Project's Open Assessment
during a year in which the National Pediatric Readiness
Assessment is not conducted.
Section 2. Subsections (4) through (19) of section
395.1055, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5)
through (20), respectively, paragraph (c) of subsection (1) is
amended, and a new subsection (4) is added to that section to
read:
395.1055 Rules and enforcement.—
(1) The agency shall adopt rules pursuant to ss.
120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement the provisions of this part,
which shall include reasonable and fair minimum standards for
ensuring that:
(c) A comprehensive emergency management plan is prepared
and updated annually. Such standards must be included in the
rules adopted by the agency after consulting with the Division
of Emergency Management. At a minimum, the rules must provide
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb355 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 355 2026 Legislature
for plan components that address emergency evacuation
transportation; adequate sheltering arrangements; postdisaster
activities, including emergency power, food, and water;
postdisaster transportation; supplies; staffing; emergency
equipment; individual identification of residents and transfer
of records, and responding to family inquiries, and the needs of
pediatric and neonatal patients. The comprehensive emergency
management plan is subject to review and approval by the local
emergency management agency. During its review, the local
emergency management agency shall ensure that the following
agencies, at a minimum, are given the opportunity to review the
plan: the Department of Elderly Affairs, the Department of
Health, the Agency for Health Care Administration, and the
Division of Emergency Management. Also, appropriate volunteer
organizations must be given the opportunity to review the plan.
The local emergency management agency shall complete its review
within 60 days and either approve the plan or advise the
facility of necessary revisions.
(4) The agency, in consultation with the Florida Emergency
Medical Services for Children State Partnership Program, shall
adopt rules that establish minimum standards for pediatric
patient care in hospital emergency departments, including, but
not limited to, availability and immediate access to pediatric
specific equipment and supplies.
100 Section 3. Paragraph (n) is added to subsection (3) of
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb355 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 355 2026 Legislature
101 section 408.05, Florida Statutes, to read:
102 408.05 Florida Center for Health Information and
103 Transparency.—
104 (3) HEALTH INFORMATION TRANSPARENCY.—In order to
105 disseminate and facilitate the availability of comparable and
106 uniform health information, the agency shall perform the
107 following functions:
108 (n)1. Collect the overall assessment score of National
109 Pediatric Readiness Assessments conducted by hospital emergency
110 departments pursuant to s. 395.1012(6), from the Florida
111 Emergency Medical Services for Children State Partnership
112 Program by December 31, 2026, and by each December 31 during a
113 year in which the National Pediatric Readiness Assessment is
114 conducted thereafter.
115 2. By April 1, 2027, and each April 1 following a year in
116 which the National Pediatric Readiness Assessment is conducted
117 thereafter, publish the overall assessment score for each
118 hospital emergency department, and provide a comparison to the
119 national average score when it becomes available.
120 3. Collect and publish no more than one overall assessment
121 score per hospital, per year, of assessments conducted pursuant
122 to s. 395.1012(7), and provide a comparison to the hospital
123 emergency department's most recently published score pursuant to
124 subparagraph 2.
125 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb355 -01-er